Washington statutes.
RCW 10.109.010

Policies.

(1) A law enforcement or corrections agency that deploys body worn cameras must establish policies regarding the use of the cameras. The policies must, at a minimum, address:

(a) When a body worn camera must be activated and deactivated, and when a law enforcement or corrections officer has the discretion to activate and deactivate the body worn camera;

(b) How a law enforcement or corrections officer is to respond to circumstances when it would be reasonably anticipated that a person may be unwilling or less willing to communicate with an officer who is recording the communication with a body worn camera;

(c) How a law enforcement or corrections officer will document when and why a body worn camera was deactivated prior to the conclusion of an interaction with a member of the public while conducting official law enforcement or corrections business;

(d) How, and under what circumstances, a law enforcement or corrections officer is to inform a member of the public that he or she is being recorded, including in situations where the person is a non-English speaker or has limited English proficiency, or where the person is deaf or hard of hearing;

(e) How officers are to be trained on body worn camera usage and how frequently the training is to be reviewed or renewed; and

(f) Security rules to protect data collected and stored from body worn cameras.

(2) A law enforcement or corrections agency that deploys body worn cameras before June 9, 2016, must establish the policies within one hundred twenty days of June 9, 2016. A law enforcement or corrections agency that deploys body worn cameras on or after June 9, 2016, must establish the policies before deploying body worn cameras.

[ 2018 c 285 s 2; 2016 c 163 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 163: See note following RCW 42.56.240.